Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3641.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COMMUSICATION.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the Board of Directors of the Minnesota Humanities Center for a grant to ComMUSICation, a nonprofit organization, to amplify young voices and cultivate skills for success through equitable access to music, collaboration, and opportunity. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end